nl: Compatibele batterijtechnologie: Alkaline; Gelcel; Loodzuur; Lood-calcium (Pb-Ca); Lithium; Lithiumkobaltoxide (LiCoO2); Lithiumimide (Li2NH); Lithiumijzerfosfaat (LiFePO4); Lithium-nikkel-kobaltaluminiumoxide (LiNCA); Lithium-nikkel-mangaan-kobaltoxide (LiNMC); Lithium-polymeer (LiPo); Lithiumthionylchloride (LiSOCl2); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-ion hoge dichtheid (LiHD); Lithium-mangaandioxide (LiMnO2); Nickel-cadmium (NiCd); Nikkel-metaalhydride (NiMH); Nickel-oxyhydroxide (NiOx); Nikkel-zink (NiZn); Polymeer; Zilveroxide (Ag2O); Klepgeregelde loodzuuraccu (VLRA); Zinkchloride; Zink-lucht; Zink-koolstof; Zink-mangaandioxide (Zn/MnO2); Andere
th: เทคโนโลยีแบตเตอรี่ที่รองรับ: อัลคาไลน์; แบตเตอรี่เจล; ตะกั่วกรด; ตะกั่วแคลเซียม (Pb-Ca); ลิเธียม; ลิเธียมโคบอลต์ออกไซด์ (LiCoO2); ลิเธียมอิไมด์ (Li2NH); ลิเธียมไอร์ออนฟอสเฟต (LiFePO4); ลิเธียมนิกเกิลโคบอลต์อะลูมิเนียมออกไซด์ (LiNCA); ลิเธียมนิกเกิลแมงกานีสโคบอลต์ออกไซด์ (LiNMC); ลิเธียมโพลีเมอร์ (LiPo); ลิเธียมไทโอนิลคลอไรด์ (LiSOCl2); ลิเธียมไอออน (Li-ion); ลิเธียมไอออนความหนาแน่นสูง (LiHD); ลิเธียมแมงกานีสไดออกไซด์ (LiMnO2); นิกเกิลแคดเมียม (NiCd); นิกเกิลเมทัลไฮไดรด์ (NiMH); นิกเกิลออกซีไฮดรอกไซด์ (NiOx); นิกเกิลซิงค์ (NiZn); โพลิเมอร์; ซิลเวอร์ออกไซด์ (Ag2O); แบตเตอรี่แบบมีวาล์วระบายแรงดันภายใน (VLRA); ซิงค์คลอไรด์; ซิงค์แอร์; ซิงค์คาร์บอน; ซิงค์แมงกานีสไดออกไซด์ (Zn/MnO2); อื่นๆ
ko: 호환 가능한 배터리 기술: 알카라인; 젤 배터리; 납산; 납칼슘(Pb-Ca); 리튬; 리튬 코발트 산화물(LiCoO2); 리튬이미드(Li2NH); 리튬인산철(LiFePO4); 리튬 니켈 코발트 알루미늄 산화물(LiNCA); 리튬 니켈 망가니즈 코발트 산화물(LiNMC); 리튬폴리머(LiPo); 리튬염화티오닐(LiSOCl2); 리튬 이온(Li-ion); 리튬 이온 고밀도(LiHD); 리튬 망가니즈 이산화물(LiMnO2); 니켈 카드뮴(NiCd); 니켈수소(NiMH); 니켈 옥시수산화물(NiOx); 니켈 아연(NiZn); 폴리머; 산화은(Ag2O); 밸브 조절 납산(VLRA); 염화-아연; 아연-공기; 아연-탄소; 아연-이산화망가니즈(Zn/MnO2); 기타
sk-SK: Kompatibilná technológia batérie: Alkalický; Gélová bunka; Olovený akumulátor; Olovo-vápnik (Pb-Ca); Lítium; Oxid lítny kobaltnatý (LiCoO2); Lítiumimid (Li2NH); Fosforečnan lítno-železitý (LiFePO4); Lítiumnikel-kobaltoxid hlinitý (LiNCA); Oxid lítno-nikel-mangán-kobaltnatý (LiNMC); Lítiový polymér (LiPo); Tionylchlorid lítny (LiSOCl2); Lítium-ión (Li-ion); Lítium-iónová vysoká hustota (LiHD); Oxid lítium-manganičitý (LiMnO2); Nikel-kadmium (NiCd); Hydrid niklu a kovu (NiMH); Oxyhydroxid niklu (NiOx); Nikel-zinok (NiZn); Polymér; Oxid strieborný (Ag2O); Ventilom regulovaná olovená kyselina (VLRA); Chlorid zinočnatý; Zinok-vzduch; Zinok-uhlík; Zinok-oxid manganičitý (Zn/MnO2); Iné
tr: Uyumlu Pil Teknolojisi: Alkali; Jel hücre; Kurşun-asit; Kurşun-kalsiyum (Pb-Ca); Lityum; Lityum kobalt oksit (LiCoO2); Lityum imid (Li2NH); Lityum demir fosfat (LiFePO4); Lityum nikel kobalt alüminyum oksit (LiNCA); Lityum nikel manganez kobalt oksit (LiNMC); Lityum polimer (LiPo); Lityum tiyonil klorür (LiSOCl2); Lityum-iyon (Li-iyon); Lityum iyon yüksek yoğunluklu (LiHD); Lityum-manganez dioksit (LiMnO2); Nikel-kadmiyum (NiCd); Nikel-metal hidrit (NiMH); Nikel-oksihidroksit (NiOx); Nikel-çinko (NiZn); Polimer; Gümüş oksit (Ag2O); Valf ayarlı kurşun-asit (VLRA); Çinko klorür; Çinko-hava; Çinko-karbon; Çinko-mangan dioksit (Zn/MnO2); Diğer
cs: Kompatibilní technologie baterie: Alkalické; Gelové; Olověné; Olověno-vápenaté (Pb-Ca); Lithium; Oxid lithný kobaltnatý (LiCoO2); Imid lithný (Li2NH); Lithium železo fosfát (LiFePO4); Lithium nikl kobalt oxidy hliníku (LiNCA); Lithium nikl mangan oxidy kobaltu (LiNMC); Lithium polymerové (LiPo); Lithium thionyl chlorid (LiSOCl2); Lithium-iontové (Li-ion); Lithium-iontové s vysokou hustotou (LiHD); Lithium mangan dioxid (LiMnO2); Nikl kadmium (NiCd); Nikl-metal hydrid (NiMH); Nikl-oxyhydroxid (NiOx); Nikl-zinek (NiZn); Polymer; Oxid stříbrný (Ag2O); Olověný akumulátor s ventilovou regulací (VLRA); Chlorid zinečnatý; Zinko vzduchová baterie; Zinkouhlíková baterie; Oxid zinečnatý a manganatý (Zn/MnO2); Jiné
de: Kompatible Batterietechnologie: Alkaline; Gelzelle; Blei-Säure; Blei-Calcium (Pb-Ca); Lithium; Lithium-Cobaltdioxid (LiCoO2); Lithium-Imide (Li2NH); Lithium-Eisenphosphat (LiFePO4); Lithium-Nickel-Kobalt-Aluminiumoxid (LiNCA); Lithium-Nickel-Mangan-Kobaltoxid (LiNMC); Lithium-Polymer (LiPo); Lithium-Thionyl-Chlorid (LiSOCl2); Lithium-Ionen (Li-Ion); Lithium-Ionen-Hochdichte (LiHD); Lithium-Mangandioxid (LiMnO2); Nickel-Cadmium (NiCd); Nickel-Metallhydrid (NiMH); Nickel-Oxyhydroxid (NiOx); Nickel-Zink (NiZn); Polymer; Silberoxid (Ag2O); Ventilgeregelte Blei-Säure (VLRA); Zink-Chlorid; Zink-Luft; Zink-Kohlenstoff; Zink-Mangandioxid (Zn/MnO2); Sonstiges
pt-BR: Tecnologia da bateria compatível: Alcalino; Célula de gel; Chumbo ácido; Chumbo-cálcio (Pb-Ca); Lítio; Óxido de lítio-cobalto (LiCoO2); Imida de lítio (Li2NH); Fosfato de ferro-lítio (LiFePO4); Óxido de alumínio-lítio-níquel-cobalto (LiNCA); Óxido de lítio-níquel-manganês-cobalto (LiNMC); Polímero de lítio (LiPo); Cloreto de tionila de lítio (LiSOCl2); Íon de lítio (íon de lítio); Alta densidade de íons de lítio (LiHD); Dióxido de lítio-manganês (LiMnO2); Níquel-cádmio (NiCd); Hidreto metálico de níquel (NiMH); Oxi-hidróxido de níquel (NiOx); Níquel-zinco (NiZn); Polímero; Óxido de prata (Ag2O); Chumbo-ácido regulado por válvula (VLRA); Cloreto de zinco; Zinco-ar; Zinco-carbono; Dióxido de zinco-manganês (Zn/MnO2); Outro
nb: Kompatibel batteriteknologi: Alkalisk; Gelcelle; Blysyre; Blykalsium (Pb-Ca); Litium; Litiumkoboltoksid (LiCoO2); Litiumimid (Li2NH); Litiumjernfosfat (LiFePO4); Litium nikkel kobolt aluminiumoksid (LiNCA); Litium nikkel mangan koboltoksid (LiNMC); Litiumpolymer (LiPo); Litiumtionylklorid (LiSOCl2); Litium-ion (Li-ion); Litium-ion høy tetthet (LiHD); Litium-mangandioksid (LiMnO2); Nikkelcadmium (NiCd); Nikkelmetallhydrid (NiMH); Nikkeloxyhydroksid (NiOx); Nikkelsink (NiZn); Polymer; Sølvoksid (Ag2O); Ventilregulert blysyre (VLRA); Sinkklorid; Sink-luft; Sink-karbon; Sink-mangandioksid (Zn/MnO2); Annen
es: Tecnología de batería compatible: Alcalino; Celda de gel; Ácido de plomo; Plomo-calcio (Pb-Ca); Litio; Óxido de litio y cobalto (LiCoO2); Imida de litio (Li2NH); Fosfato de litio y hierro (LiFePO4); Óxido de litio, níquel, cobalto y aluminio (LiNCA); Óxido de litio, níquel, manganeso y cobalto (LiNMC); Polímero de litio (LiPo); Cloruro de litio y tionilo (LiSOCl2); Ión-litio (Li-ion); Ión-litio de alta densidad (LiHD); Dióxido de litio-manganeso (LiMnO2); Níquel-cadmio (NiCd); Níquel-hidruro metálico (NiMH); Níquel-oxihidróxido (NiOx); Níquel-zinc (NiZn); Polímero; Óxido de plata (Ag2O); Plomo-ácido regulado por válvula (VLRA); Cloruro de zinc; Zinc-aire; Zinc-carbono; Dióxido de zinc-manganeso (Zn/MnO2); Otros
lt-LT: Suderinama maitinimo elementų technologija: Šarminis; Gelinis elementas; Švino rūgštis; Švinas-kalcis (Pb-Ca); Litis; Ličio kobalto oksidas (LiCoO2); Ličio imidas (Li2NH); Ličio geležies fosfatas (LiFePO4); Ličio nikelio kobalto aliuminio oksidas (LiNCA); Ličio nikelio mangano kobalto oksidas (LiNMC); Ličio polimeras (LiPo); Ličio tionilchloridas (LiSOCl2); Ličio jonai (Li-ion); Didelio tankio ličio jonų (LiHD); Ličio mangano dioksidas (LiMnO2); Nikelis kadmis (NiCd); Nikelio metalo hidridas (NiMH); Nikelio oksihidroksidas (NiOx); Nikelis-cinkas (NiZn); Polimeras; Sidabro oksidas (Ag2O); Vožtuvu reguliuojama švino rūgštis (VLRA); Cinko chlorido; Cinko oro; Cinko anglies; Cinko mangano dioksidas (Zn/MnO2); Kita
sl-SI: Združljiva tehnologija baterij: Alkalna; Gel celica; Svinčeno-kislinski; Svinec-kalcij (Pb-Ca); Litij; Litijev kobaltov oksid (LiCoO2); Litijev imid (Li2NH); Litijev železov fosfat (LiFePO4); Litijev nikelj kobalt aluminijev oksid (LiNCA); Litijev nikelj manganov kobaltov oksid (LiNMC); Litijev polimer (LiPo); Litijev tionil klorid (LiSOCl2); Litij-ion (Li-ion); Litij-ion visoke gostote (LiHD); Litij-manganov dioksid (LiMnO2); Nikelj-kadmij (NiCd); Nikelj-metal hidrid (NiMH); Nikelj-oksihidroksid (NiOx); Nikelj-cink (NiZn); Polimer; Srebrov oksid (Ag2O); Ventilsko regulirana svinčeno kislina (VLRA); Cinkov klorid; Cink-zrak; Cink-ogljik; Cinkov-manganov dioksid (Zn/MnO2); Drugo
it: Tecnologia della batteria compatibile: Alkaline; Cella di gel; Piombo acido; Piombo-calcio (Pb-Ca); Litio; Ossido di litio cobalto (LiCoO2); Immide di litio (Li2NH); Litio ferro fosfato (LiFePO4); Ossido di alluminio litio nichel cobalto (LiNCA); Ossido di litio nichel manganese cobalto (LiNMC); Polimeri di litio (LiPo); Litio cloruro di tionile (LiSOCl2); Ioni di litio (Li-ion); Ioni di litio ad alta densità (LiHD); Biossido di litio-manganese (LiMnO2); Nichel-cadmio (NiCd); Nichel-metallo idruro (NiMH); Ossidrossido di nichel (NiOx); Nichel-zinco (NiZn); Polimero; Ossido d'argento (Ag2O); Piombo-acido regolato da valvola (VLRA); Cloruro di zinco; Zinco-aria; Zinco-carbone; Biossido di zinco-manganese (Zn/MnO2); Altro
hu: Kompatibilis akkumulátor technológiája: Alkáli; Zselés cella; Ólom-sav; Ólom-kálcium (Pb-Ca); Lítium; Lítium-kobalt-oxid (LiCoO2); Lítium-imid (Li2NH); Lítium-vas-foszfát (LiFePO4); Lítium-nikkel-kobalt-alumínium-oxid (LiNCA); Lítium-nikkel-mangán-kobalt-oxid (LiNMC); Lítium-polimer (LiPo); Lítium-tionil-klorid (LiSOCl2); Lítium-ion (Li-ion); Nagy energiasűrűségű lítium-ion (LiHD); Lítium-mangán-dioxid (LiMnO2); Nikkel-kadmium (NiCd); Nikkel-fém-hidrid (NiMH); Nikkel-oxi-hidroxid (NiOx); Nikkel-cink (NiZn); Polimer; Ezüst-oxid (Ag2O); Szelepszabályozású ólom-sav (VLRA); Cink-klorid; Cink-levegő; Cink-szén; Cink-mangán-dioxid (Zn/MnO2); Egyéb
ru: Совместимая технология аккумулятора: Щелочной; Гелевый; Свинцово-кислотный; Свинцово-кальциевый (Pb-Ca); Литиевый; Литий-кобальт-оксидный (LiCoO2); Литий-имидный (Li2NH); Литий-железо-фосфатный (LiFePO4); Литий-никель-кобальт-алюминий-оксидный (LiNCA); Литий-никель-марганец-кобальт-оксидный (LiNMC); Литий-полимерный (LiPo); Литий-тионилхлоридный (LiSOCl2); Литий-ионный (Li-ion); Литий-ионный высокой плотности (LiHD); Литий-диоксид-марганцевый (LiMnO2); Никель-кадмиевый (NiCd); Никель-металлгидридный (NiMH); Никель-гидроксидный (NiOx); Никель-цинковый (NiZn); Полимерный; Серебряно-оксидный (Ag2O); Свинцово-кислотный с клапанным регулированием (VLRA); Цинк-хлоридный; Воздушно-цинковый; Угольно-цинковый; Цинк-диоксид-марганцевый (Zn/MnO2); Другой
zh-CN: 适用电池技术: 碱性; Gel 型胶体; 铅酸; 铅钙 (Pb-Ca); 锂; 钴酸锂（LiCoO2）; 酰亚胺锂 (Li2NH); 磷酸铁锂（LiFePO4）; 镍钴铝酸锂（LiNCA）; 镍锰钴酸锂（LiNMC）; 锂聚合物（LiPo）; 锂亚硫酰氯 (LiSOCl2); 锂离子（Li-ion）; 高密度锂离子 (LiHD); 锂二氧化锰（LiMnO2）; 镍镉 (NiCd); 镍氢 (NiMH); 羟基氧化镍 (NiOx); 镍锌 (NiZn); 聚合物; 氧化银 (Ag2O); 阀控铅酸蓄电池 (VLRA); 氯化锌; 锌-空气; 锌-碳; 锌二氧化锰（Zn/MnO2）; 其他
pt-PT: Tecnologia de bateria compatível: Alcalino; Célula de gel; Chumbo ácido; Chumbo-cálcio (Pb-Ca); Lítio; Óxido de cobalto de lítio (LiCoO2); Imida de lítio (Li2NH); Fosfato de lítio e ferro (LiFePO4); Óxido de lítio níquel cobalto alumínio (LiNCA); Óxido de lítio níquel manganês cobalto (LiNMC); Polímero de lítio (LiPo); Cloreto de tionila de lítio (LiSOCl2); Íon de lítio (Li-ion); Íon de lítio de alta densidade (LiHD); Dióxido de lítio manganês (LiMnO2); Níquel cádmio (NiCd); Hidreto de níquel metálico (NiMH); Oxihidróxido de níquel (NiOx); Níquel zinco (NiZn); Polímero; Óxido de prata (Ag2O); Chumbo-ácido regulado por válvula (VLRA); Cloreto de zinco; Zinco-ar; Zinco-carbono; Dióxido de zinco manganês (Zn/MnO2); Outro
ja: 対応するバッテリー技術: アルカリ; ゲルセル; 鉛酸; 鉛カルシウム (Pb-Ca); リチウム; コバルト酸リチウム (LiCoO2); リチウムイミド (Li2NH); リン酸鉄リチウム (LiFePO4); リチウムニッケルコバルトアルミニウム酸化物 (LiNCA); リチウムニッケルマンガンコバルト酸化物 (LiNMC); リチウムポリマー (LiPo); リチウム塩化チオニル (LiSOCl2); リチウムイオン (Li-ion); 高密度リチウムイオン (LiHD); 二酸化マンガンリチウム (LiMnO2); ニッケルカドミウム (NiCd); ニッケル水素 (NiMH); オキシ水酸化ニッケル (NiOx); ニッケル亜鉛 (NiZn); ポリマー; 酸化銀 (Ag2O); 制御弁式鉛蓄電池 (VLRA); 塩化亜鉛; 亜鉛空気; 亜鉛炭素; 亜鉛・二酸化マンガン (Zn/MnO2); その他
sv: Kompatibel batteriteknik: Alkalisk; Gelcell; Bly-syra; Bly-kalcium (Pb-Ca); Litium; Litiumkoboltoxid (LiCoO2); Litiumimid (Li2NH); Litiumjärnfosfat (LiFePO4); Litiumnickelkoboltaluminiumoxid (LiNCA); Litiumnickelmangankoboltoxid (LiNMC); Litiumpolymer (LiPo); Litiumtionylklorid (LiSOCl2); Litiumjon (Li-jon); Litiumjon högdensitet (LiHD); Litiummangandioxid (LiMnO2); Nickel-cadmium (NiCd); Nickelmetallhydrid (NiMH); Nickel-oxyhydroxide (NiOx); Nickel-zinc (NiZn); Polymer; Silveroxid (Ag2O); Ventilreglerad blysyra (VLRA); Zinkklorid; Zinc-air; Zinc-carbon; Zink-mangandioxid (Zn/MnO2); Annat
vi: Công nghệ pin tương thích: Alkaline; Pin gel; Axit chì; Chì canxi (Pb-Ca); Lithium; Lithium cobalt oxide (LiCoO2); Lithium imide (Li2NH); Lithium sắt phosphate (LiFePO4); Lithium niken cobalt nhôm oxide (LiNCA); Lithium niken mangan cobalt oxide (LiNMC); Lithium polymer (LiPo); Lithium thionyl chloride (LiSOCl2); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-ion mật độ cao (LiHD); Liti-mangan dioxide (LiMnO2); Niken-cadmium (NiCd); Niken-hydride kim loại (NiMH); Niken-oxyhydroxide (NiOx); Niken-kẽm (NiZn); Polime; Bạc oxit (Ag2O); Axit chì có van điều chỉnh (VLRA); Kẽm clorua; Kẽm-không khí; Kẽm-carbon; Kẽm-mangan dioxide (Zn/MnO2); Khác
zh-TW: 相容電池技術: 鹼性; 密封凝膠; 鉛酸; 鉛鈣 (Pb-Ca); 鋰; 鈷酸鋰（LiCoO2）; 酰亞胺鋰 (Li2NH); 磷酸鐵鋰（LiFePO4）; 鎳鈷鋁酸鋰（LiNCA）; 鎳錳鈷酸鋰（LiNMC）; 鋰聚合物（LiPo）; 鋰亞硫醯氯 (LiSOCl2); 鋰離子（Li-ion）; 高密度鋰離子 (LiHD); 鋰二氧化錳（LiMnO2）; 鎳鎘 (NiCd); 鎳氫 (NiMH); 羥基氧化鎳 (NiOx); 鎳鋅 (NiZn); 聚合物; 氧化銀 (Ag2O); 閥控鉛酸蓄電池 (VLRA); 氯化鋅; 鋅空氣; 鋅碳; 鋅二氧化錳（Zn/MnO2）; 其他
fr: Technologie de batterie compatible: Alkaline; Cellule de gel; Plomb-acide; Plomb-calcium (Pb-Ca); Lithium; Oxyde de lithium et de cobalt (LiCoO2); Liimide de lithium (Li2NH); Phosphate de fer et de lithium (LiFePO4); Oxyde de lithium, nickel, cobalt et aluminium (LiNCA); Oxyde de lithium, nickel, manganèse et cobalt (LiNMC); Lithium polymère (LiPo); Chlorure de lithium thionyle (LiSOCl2); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-ion haute densité (LiHD); Dioxyde de lithium-manganèse (LiMnO2); Nickel-cadmium (NiCd); Nickel-hydrure métallique (NiMH); Nickel-oxyhydroxide (NiOx); Nickel-zinc (NiZn); Polymère; Oxyde d'argent (Ag2O); Acide au plomb régulé par valve (VLRA); Chlorure de zinc; Zinc-air; Zinc-carbon; Dioxyde de zinc-manganèse (Zn/MnO2); Autre
fi: Yhteensopiva akkuteknologia: Alkali; Geelisolu; Lyijyhappo; Lyijy-kalsium (Pb-Ca); Litium; Litiumkobolttioksidi (LiCoO2); Litiumimidi (Li2NH); Litium-rautafosfaatti (LiFePO4); Litium-nikkeli-kobolttialumiinioksidi (LiNCA); Litium-nikkeli-mangaanikobolttioksidi (LiNMC); Litiumpolymeeri (LiPo); Litiumtionyylikloridi (LiSOCl2); Litiumioni (Li-ion); Lithium-ion high density (LiHD); Litium-mangaanidioksidi (LiMnO2); Nikkeli-kadmium (NiCd); Nikkeli-metallihydridi (NiMH); Nikkeli-oksihydroksidi (NiOx); Nikkeli-sinkki (NiZn); Polymeeri; Hopeaoksidi (Ag2O); Venttiilisäädelty lyijyhappo (VLRA); Sinkkikloridi; Sinkki-ilma; Sinkki-hiili; Sinkki-mangaanidioksidi (Zn/MnO2); Muu
bg-BG: Съвместима технология за батерии: Алкална; Гел клетка; Оловно-киселинна; Олово-калций (Pb-Ca); Литий; Литиево-кобалтов оксид (LiCoO2); Литиев имид (Li2NH); Литиево-железен фосфат (LiFePO4); Литиево-никелов кобалтово-алуминиев оксид (LiNCA); Литиево-никелов манганово-кобалтов оксид (LiNMC); Литиево-полимерна (LiPo); Литиев тионилхлорид (LiSOCl2); Литиево-йонна (Li-ion); Литиево-йонна висока плътност (LiHD); Литиево-манганов диоксид (LiMnO2); Никел-кадмий (NiCd); Никел-металхидрид (NiMH); Никел-оксихидроксид (NiOx); Никел-цинк (NiZn); Полимер; Сребърен оксид (Ag2O); Клапанно регулирана оловно-киселинна (VLRA); Цинков хлорид; Цинк-въздух; Цинк-въглерод; Цинково-манганов диоксид (Zn/MnO2); Други
ro-RO: Tehnologie baterie compatibilă: Alcalină; Celulă cu gel; Plumb-acid; Plumb-calciu (Pb-Ca); Litiu; Oxid de litiu cobalt (LiCoO2); Imide de litiu (Li2NH); Litiu-fier-fosfat (LiFePO4); Litiu nichel cobalt oxid de aluminiu (LiNCA); Oxid de litiu nichel mangan cobalt (LiNMC); Polimer de litiu (LiPo); Clorură de litiu tionil (LiSOCl2); Litiu-ion (Li-ion); Litiu-ion de înaltă densitate (LiHD); Dioxid de litiu-mangan (LiMnO2); Nichel-cadmiu (NiCd); Nichel-metal-hidrură (NiMH); Oxihidroxid de nichel (NiOx); Nichel-zinc (NiZn); Polimer; Oxid de argint (Ag2O); Plumb-acid reglat prin supapă (VLRA); Clorură de zinc; Zinc-aer; Zinc-carbon; Dioxid de zinc-mangan (Zn/MnO2); Altele
el: Συμβατή τεχνολογία μπαταρίας: Αλκαλική; Κυψέλη γέλης; Μολύβδου-οξέος; Μολύβδου-ασβεστίου (Pb-Ca); Λιθίου; Οξειδίου λιθίου-κοβαλτίου  (LiCoO2); Ιμιδίου λιθίου (Li2NH); Φωσφορικού σιδήρου-λιθίου (LiFePO4); Οξειδίου αργιλίου κοβαλτίου νικελίου λιθίου (LiNCA); Οξειδίου κοβαλτίου μαγγανίου νικελίου λιθίου (LiNMC); Πολυμερών λιθίου (LiPo); Θειονυλοχλωριδίου-λιθίου (LiSOCl2); Ιόντων λιθίου (Li-ion); Ιόντων λιθίου υψηλής πυκνότητας (LiHD); Διοξειδίου λιθίου-μαγγανίου (LiMnO2); Νικελίου-καδμίου (NiCd); Νικελίου-υδρογονωμένου μετάλλου (NiMH); Οξυ-υδροξείδιου του νικελίου (NiOx); Νικελίου-ψευδαργύρου (NiZn); Πολυμερές; Οξειδίου του αργύρου (Ag2O); Μολύβδου-οξέος με ρυθμιστική βαλβίδα (VLRA); Χλωριούχου ψευδαργύρου; Ψευδαργύρου-αέρα; Ψευδαργύρου-άνθρακα; Διοξειδίου ψευδαργύρου-μαγγανίου (Zn/MnO2); Άλλο
hr-HR: Kompatibilna tehnologija baterije: Alkalna; Gel-ćelija; Olovo-kiselina; Olovo-kalcij (Pb-Ca); Litij; Litij-kobalt oksid (LiCoO2); Litijev imid (Li2NH); Litij-željezo fosfat (LiFePO4); Litij-nikal-kobalt-aluminij oksid (LiNCA); Litij-nikal-mangan-kobalt oksid (LiNMC); Litij-polimer (LiPo); Litij-tionil klorid (LiSOCl2); Litij-ion (Li-ion); Litij-ion visoke gustoće (LiHD); Litij-mangan dioksid (LiMnO2); Nikal-kadmij (NiCd); Nikal-metal hidrid (NiMH); Nikal-oksihidroksid (NiOx); Nikal-cink (NiZn); Polimer; Srebro-oksid (Ag2O); Ventilom regulirana olovna kiselina (VLRA); Cinkov klorid; Cink-zrak; Cink-ugljik; Cink-mangan dioksid (Zn/MnO2); Ostalo
pl: Zgodna technologia wykonania akumulatora: Alkaliczna; Ogniwo żelowe; Kwas ołowiowy; Ołowiowo-wapniowa (Pb-Ca); Litowa; Tlenek litowo-kobaltowy (LiCoO2); Imidek litu (Li2NH); Fosforan litowo-żelazowy (LiFePO4); Tlenek litowo-niklowo-kobaltowo-glinowy (LiNCA); Tlenek litowo-niklowo-manganowo-kobaltowy (LiNMC); Polimer litowy (LiPo); Chlorek tionylu litu (LiSOCl2); Litowo-jonowa (Li-ion); Litowo-jonowa o dużej gęstości (LiHD); Dwutlenek litowo-manganowy (LiMnO2); Niklowo-kadmowa (NiCd); Niklowo-metalowo-wodorkowa (NiMH); Wodorotlenek niklu (NiOx); Niklowo-cynkowa (NiZn); Polimery; Tlenek srebra (Ag2O); Kwasowo-ołowiowa regulowana zaworem (VLRA); Chlorek cynku; Cynkowo-powietrzna; Cynkowo-węglowa; Dwutlenek cynku i manganu (Zn/MnO2); Pozostałe
en: Compatible battery technology: Alkaline; Gel cell; Lead-acid; Lead-calcium (Pb-Ca); Lithium; Lithium cobalt oxide (LiCoO2); Lithium imide (Li2NH); Lithium iron phosphate (LiFePO4); Lithium nickel cobalt aluminum oxide (LiNCA); Lithium nickel manganese cobalt oxide (LiNMC); Lithium polymer (LiPo); Lithium thionyl chloride (LiSOCl2); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-ion high density (LiHD); Lithium-manganese dioxide (LiMnO2); Nickel-cadmium (NiCd); Nickel-metal hydride (NiMH); Nickel-oxyhydroxide (NiOx); Nickel-zinc (NiZn); Polymer; Silver-oxide (Ag2O); Valve-regulated lead-acid (VLRA); Zinc chloride; Zinc-air; Zinc-carbon; Zinc-manganese dioxide (Zn/MnO2); Other
da: Kompatibel batteriteknologi: Alkalisk; Gelcelle; Bly-syre; Bly-calcium (Pb-Ca); Lithium; Lithiumcobaltoxid (LiCoO2); Lithiumimid (Li2NH); Lithiumjernfosfat (LiFePO4); Lithiumnikkelkoboltaluminiumoxid (LiNCA); Lithiumnikkelmangankoboltoxid (LiNMC); Lithiumpolymer (LiPo); Lithiumthionylchlorid (LiSOCl2); Lithium-ion (Li-ion); Lithium-ion høj densitet (LiHD); Lithium-mangandioxid (LiMnO2); Nikkel-cadmium (NiCd); Nikkel-metalhydrid (NiMH); Nikkel-oxyhydroxid (NiOx); Nikkel-zink (NiZn); Polymer; Sølvoxid (Ag2O); Ventilreguleret blysyre (VLRA); Zinkklorid; Zink-luft; Zink-kulstof; Zink-mangandioxid (Zn/MnO2); Andet